Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Retirement Requirements

47-24-100.
Eligibility; effective date and application.

Upon the written application to the board, any member of the fund who:

Has attained the age of 60 years;

Has completed 20 or more years of creditable service, at least 15 of which were service as a member of the Georgia National Guard;

Served at least ten consecutive years as a member of the Georgia National Guard immediately before discharge; provided, however, for purposes of this paragraph, activation of a Georgia National Guard member into any of the regular components of the armed forces shall not constitute a break in service; and

Has received an honorable discharge from the Georgia National Guard

shall be retired by the board on a retirement allowance and shall thereupon become a beneficiary of the fund.

The effective date of retirement shall be the first day of the month in which the application is received by the board, provided that no retirement application shall, in any case, be earlier than the first day of the month following the month of the applicant’s discharge from the Georgia National Guard. Applications for retirement shall not be accepted more than 90 days in advance of the date of discharge.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 638, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1010, § 5/HB 1020.

47-24-101.
Retirement allowance — Amount.

Upon retirement under subsection (a) of Code Section 47-24-100, the retired member shall receive a monthly service retirement allowance of $50.00 plus an additional $5.00 per month for each year of creditable service over 20 years, up to a maximum monthly benefit of $100.00.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.

47-24-102.
Retirement allowance — Monthly payments; cease after death.

All retirement allowances shall be paid in monthly payments and shall cease in the month in which the death of the member occurs.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, Code Section 47-23-102 as enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-24-102.

47-24-103.
Returning to service; recalculation of retirement allowance after cessation.

If any retired member returns to the service of the Georgia National Guard, his or her retirement allowance shall cease. Upon cessation of such service, the retired member, after proper notification to the board, shall receive a retirement allowance calculated according to the number of years of creditable service the member has accumulated at the end of such return to service.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.